Washington statutes.
RCW 10.66.080

Notice of order to law enforcement agency.

A copy of an off-limits order granted under this chapter shall be forwarded by the court to the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the PADT area specified in the order on or before the next judicial day following issuance of the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall promptly enter it into an appropriate law enforcement information system.

[ 1989 c 271 s 221.]